New York, session 2025-2026, A1271.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The insurance law is amended by adding a new section 2619 2 to read as follows: 3 § 2619. Discrimination based on inquiries. (a) No insurer shall report 4 to an insurance support organization or company that collects and main- 5 tains claims history reports from insurers, any inquiry about a policy, 6 including any inquiry in which loss or damage is revealed under a home- 7 owners', personal lines fire, or non-business motor vehicle insurance 8 policy. 9 (b) No insurer shall refuse to issue or renew a homeowners', personal 10 lines fire, or non-business motor vehicle insurance policy, impose or 11 offer a higher rate or premium for any such policy, or assign to a more 12 expensive affiliate, rating tier or category, an insured or applicant 13 for any such policy on the basis of any inquiry about a policy, includ- 14 ing any inquiry in which loss or damage is revealed to the insurer or 15 any previous insurers, or on the basis of any such inquiry reported to 16 or recorded by an insurance support organization or company that 17 collects and maintains claims history reports from insurers. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02979-01-5